Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201669-314
Rules and regulations.

The department, in consultation with the Board of Optometry and the Board of Medicine and Surgery, may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Consumer Protection in Eye Care Act.

Laws 2016, LB235, § 7.